src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-28kannwlj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kannõĺ: # Noun (28) kannõĺ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Nom: kannõĺ
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Gen: kandlõ
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Par: kannõld
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Ill: kandlõhe
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Ine: kandlõn
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Ela: kandlõst
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+All: kandlõlõ
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Ade: kandlõl
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Abl: kandlõlt
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Tra: kandlõs
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Ter: kandlõniq
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Abe: kandlõldaq
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Com: kandlõgaq
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Nom: kandlõq
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Gen: kandlidõ
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Par: kandlit
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Ill: kandlihe
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Ine: kandlin
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Ela: kandlist
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+All: kandlilõ
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Ade: kandlil
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Abl: kandlilt
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Tra: kandlis
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Ter: kandliniq
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Abe: kandlildaq
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Com: kandlidõgaq
